Arkansas, session 2025, HB1435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-45-109(b), concerning certification of
childcare facilities by the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood
Education, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Upon certification of the childcare facilities, the division shall
provide a listing of all certified facilities and their certification numbers
to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration for the
purpose of the income tax credit or refund provided for in §§ 26-51-502 and
26-51-507.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-78-205(d), concerning the Division of
*JLL149*
02-27-2025 11:22:33 JLL149

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1435
Child Care and Early Childhood Education, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) The Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education shall
create and make available on the its website of the department a form and
graphical chart that concisely explains the:
(A) Minimum licensing requirements for a licensed home;
(B) Minimum licensing requirements for a licensed
childcare center;
(C) Procedure for obtaining licensure as a licensed home
or licensed childcare center;
(D) Registration requirements for a registered childcare
family home;
(E) Procedure for registering as a registered childcare
family home;
(F) Voluntary registry of daycare family homes;
(G) Procedure for registering a daycare family home with
the voluntary registry;
(H) Availability of federal or state funds, grants,
programs, or other financial assistance, including without limitation the:
(i) Community Facilities Guaranteed Loan Program;
(ii) Community Development Block Grant;
(iii) Child and Adult Care Food Program;
(iv) Child Care and Development Block Grant;
(v) Early Head Start-Child Care Partnership Grant;
(vi) Arkansas Better Chance Program; and
(vii) Arkansas Special Nutrition Program; and
(I) Availability of a federal or state tax credit or other
federal or state tax benefit, including without limitation the employer-
provided child care credit that is available to taxpayers under §§ 26-51-507
and 26-51-508.
(2) The Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education
shall place a form and graphical chart created in accordance with subdivision
(d)(1) of this section in a conspicuous location on the its website of the
department.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-507 is repealed.
26-51-507. Employer-provided child care — As qualified under former §
02-27-2025 11:22:33 JLL149

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1435
26-52-401 — Definition.
(a) A business which qualifies for the exemption from the gross
receipts tax under former § 26-52-401(29) shall be allowed an income tax
credit of three and nine-tenths percent (3.9%) of the annual salary of
employees employed exclusively in providing childcare services.
(b) If two (2) or more businesses participate in a childcare program
for their employees as provided by former § 26-52-401(29), then each business
will be allowed an income tax credit of three and nine-tenths percent (3.9%)
of the annual salary of only those employees who are on the respective
business' payroll and are employed exclusively for providing childcare
services.
(c)(1) To qualify for the income tax credit, the revenue to the
business or businesses from the childcare facility cannot exceed the direct
operating costs of the facility. If, on an annual basis, the childcare
facility receives revenue which exceeds the direct operating costs of the
facility, the business or businesses will not be entitled to the income tax
credit.
(2) As used in this section, “direct operating costs” means:
(A) The cost of food and beverages provided to the
children;
(B) The cost of labor for personnel whose services are
performed exclusively on the premises of the childcare facility for the care
of the children and all related employment taxes paid by the employer; and
(C) All materials and supplies necessary to operate the
childcare facility.
(d) The income tax credit created by subsection (a) of this section
shall first be available in the taxable year following the year the business
makes payment of wages to childcare workers. To the extent that the credit is
not fully utilized in this first year, it may be carried forward for an
additional two (2) years. Any credit remaining thereafter shall expire.
(e) The income tax provisions of this section shall be in full force
and effect for all income tax years beginning on and after January 1, 1993.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 26-51-508 is amended to read as follows:
26-51-508. Employer-provided child care — As qualified under § 26-52-
516 or § 26-53-132 — Definition Definitions.
02-27-2025 11:22:33 JLL149

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1435
(a) A business which qualifies for the refund of the gross receipts
tax or compensating use tax under § 26-52-516 or § 26-53-132 shall be allowed
an income tax credit of three and nine-tenths percent (3.9%) of the annual
salary of its employees employed exclusively in providing childcare service,
or a five-thousand-dollar income tax credit for the first tax year the
business provides its employees with a childcare facility.
(b) If two (2) or more businesses participate in a childcare program
for their employees as provided by § 26-52-516 or § 26-53-132, then each
business will be allowed an income tax credit of three and nine-tenths
percent (3.9%) of the annual salary of only those employees who are on the
respective business' payroll and are employed exclusively for providing
childcare services. The first year's five-thousand-dollar credit will be
prorated among the businesses based upon the percentage of the cost paid by
each business for the initial construction and equipping of the childcare
facility.
(c)(1)(A) To qualify for the income tax credit, the revenue to the
business or businesses from the childcare facility cannot exceed the direct
operating costs of the facility.
(B) If, on an annual basis, the business receives revenues
from the operation of the childcare facility which exceed the direct
operating costs of the facility, the businesses will not be entitled to the
income tax credit.
(2) As used in this subsection, “direct operating costs” means:
(A) The cost of food and beverages provided to the
children;
(B) The cost of labor for personnel whose services are
performed exclusively on the premises of the childcare facility for the care
of the children and all related employment taxes paid by the employer; and
(C) All materials and supplies necessary to operate the
childcare facility.
(d) The income tax credit created by subsection (a) of this section
shall first be available in the taxable year following the year the business
makes payment of wages to childcare workers. To the extent that the credit is
not fully utilized in this first year, it may be carried forward for an
additional two (2) years. Any credit remaining thereafter shall expire.
(a) As used in this section:
02-27-2025 11:22:33 JLL149

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1435
(1) "Eligible expense" means:
(A) The cost of construction, renovation, expansion, or
repair of a childcare facility by a taxpayer to provide childcare services
for the employees of the taxpayer;
(B) A payment to a childcare facility licensed by the
Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education for the provision of
childcare services for one (1) or more employees of the taxpayer;
(C) A payment to a childcare facility licensed by the
division to reserve childcare services for one (1) or more employees of the
taxpayer; and
(D)(i) Fifty percent (50%) of the amount contributed by an
employer for dependent care assistance provided to an employee of the
employer under a dependent care assistance program as described in 26 U.S.C.
§ 129, as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(ii) The total amount of eligible expenses allowed
under subdivision (a)(1)(D)(i) of this section shall not exceed two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500) per employee of the employer that benefits from
a dependent care assistance program during the tax year;
(2) "Rural area" means an area in the state that is not within
the boundaries of an incorporated town or a city that has a population of
more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) according to the most recent federal
decennial census; and
(3) "Small business" means a business that has:
(A) Fewer than two hundred fifty (250) employees; and
(B) Less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in yearly
revenue.
(b)(1)(A) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income
tax imposed by this chapter in the amount equal to the eligible expenses
incurred by an employer during the tax year.
(B) The income tax credit allowed under this section shall
not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for an employer in a tax
year.
(2)(A) The total aggregate amount of income tax credits allowed
under this section for all employers shall not exceed fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000) in a calendar year.
(B)(i) Three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
02-27-2025 11:22:33 JLL149

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1435
($3,750,000) of the total aggregate amount of income tax credits that may be
allowed under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be reserved for the
award of income tax credits to small businesses and employers that have their
primary place of business located in a rural area.
(ii) The remaining amount of income tax credits that
may be allowed under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be awarded
to employers without regard to their location or size.
(c) The amount of the income tax credit under this section that may be
claimed by an employer in a tax year shall not exceed the amount of income
tax due by the employer.
(d)(1) To claim an income tax credit under this section, an employer
shall submit an application for the tax year to the Department of Finance and
Administration using the form required under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this
section.
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration shall:
(A) Prepare and provide a standardized form for an
employer to use to apply for the income tax credit allowed under this
section;
(B) Require an employer submitting an application under
this section to:
(i) Certify that the expenses for which the employer
is claiming a credit under this section are eligible expenses; and
(ii) Provide documentation to substantiate the
amount of eligible expenses for which the employer is claiming a credit under
this section; and
(C)(i) Subject to the limitations stated in this section,
award an income tax credit under this section to an employer that submits a
completed application on the required form and provides the certification and
documentation required under this section.
(ii) If an applicant for an income tax credit under
this section fails to submit a completed application on the required form or
fails to provide the certification or documentation, or both, required under
this section, the Department of Finance and Administration shall
automatically deny the application.
(e) An employer that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. §
501(c)(3), as it existed on January 1, 2025, may transfer or sell an income
02-27-2025 11:22:33 JLL149

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1435
tax credit allowed under this section.
(f) The Department of Finance and Administration may adopt rules to
administer this section.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Licensed childcare provider.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Eligible children" means individuals who are twelve (12)
years of age or younger;
(2) "Licensed childcare provider" means a person or facility
that owns or operates a childcare facility licensed by the Division of Child
Care and Early Childhood Education; and
(3) "Rural area" means an area in the state that is not within
the boundaries of an incorporated town or a city that has a population of
more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) according to the most recent federal
decennial census.
(b)(1) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter in the amount determined under subdivision (b)(2) of
this section for a licensed childcare provider.
(2)(A) Subject to the limitations stated this section, the
amount of the income tax credit allowed under this section shall be
calculated by multiplying the average monthly number of eligible children
enrolled with the licensed childcare provider claiming the income tax credit
during the tax year by one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).
(B) The income tax credit allowed under this section shall
not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a licensed childcare
provider in a tax year.
(3)(A) The total aggregate amount of income tax credits allowed
under this section for all licensed childcare providers shall not exceed five
million dollars ($5,000,000) in a calendar year.
(B)(i) One million one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($1,125,000) of the total aggregate amount of income tax credits that
may be allowed under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section shall be reserved
for the award of income tax credits to licensed childcare providers located
in a rural area.
02-27-2025 11:22:33 JLL149

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1435
(ii) The remaining amount of income tax credits that
may be allowed under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section shall be awarded
to licensed childcare providers without regard to the location of the
licensed childcare provider.
(c) The amount of the income tax credit under this section that may be
claimed by a licensed childcare provider in a tax year shall not exceed the
amount of income tax due by the licensed childcare provider.
(d)(1) To claim an income tax credit under this section, a licensed
childcare provider shall submit an application for the tax year to the
Department of Finance and Administration using the form required under
subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section.
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration shall:
(A)(i) Prepare and provide a standardized form for a
licensed childcare provider to use to apply for the income tax credit allowed
under this section.
(ii) The form required under subdivision
(d)(2)(A)(i) of this section shall require at least the following
information:
(a) Documentation evidencing the applicant's
ownership of a childcare facility licensed by the division;
(b) The amount of income tax credit for which
the licensed childcare provider is submitting an application under this
section; and
(c) The average number of eligible children
enrolled with the licensed childcare provider submitting the application
during the tax year; and
(B)(i) Subject to the limitations stated in this section,
award an income tax credit under this section to a licensed childcare
provider that submits a completed application on the required forms and
provides the information required under this section.
(ii) If an applicant for an income tax credit under
this section fails to submit a completed application on the required form or
fails to provide the information required under this section, the Department
of Finance and Administration shall automatically deny the application.
(e) A licensed childcare provider that is exempt from taxation under
26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as it existed on January 1, 2025, may transfer or sell
02-27-2025 11:22:33 JLL149

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 H2/27/25 HB1435
an income tax credit allowed under this section.
(f) The Department of Finance and Administration may adopt rules to
administer this section.

SECTION 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-5 of this act are effective for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act would create
significant changes to the state's tax laws; that taxpayers and employers
plan to meet their obligations on a calendar-year basis; and that this act is
immediately necessary to ensure the financial stability of the state, to
allow taxpayers and employers time to plan for and implement the changes in
law created by this act, and to ensure that the Department of Finance and
Administration has sufficient time to update its forms and software and train
its personnel in accordance with this act. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Achor









02-27-2025 11:22:33 JLL149